Utah, session 2026, SB259.
Section 1. Section 77-4-202 is enacted to read:77-4-202. Declaration requirement for evidence in a criminal case.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Auditor" means an employee or officer of the Office of the State Auditor.(b)"Investigator" means an employee of a prosecuting agency that conducts investigations on behalf of the prosecuting agency.(c)"Unsworn declaration" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78B-18a-102.(2)If an auditor or investigator provides or obtains evidence in a criminal case that will be used to prosecute an individual for a felony offense, the auditor or investigator shall sign a statement attesting that the evidence was obtained or provided in compliance with state and federal law.(3)When a prosecuting attorney discloses evidence to a defendant in a criminal case for a felony offense, the prosecuting attorney shall sign a statement attesting that the prosecuting attorney has complied with state and federal laws on the disclosure of exculpatory evidence to a defendant, including Rule 16 of the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.(4)A signed statement described in Subsection (2) or (3) shall include an unsworn declaration.(5)An individual who fails to comply with Subsection (2) or (3) is guilty of a class AC misdemeanor.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.